src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
Noun inflection for Võro

LEXICON N_1HANS1A  1 hanśa:hanśa

LEXICON N_1VIU  1 viu:viu

LEXICON N_1HERRAE  1 herrä:herrä

LEXICON N_1PREI  1 prei:prei

* Yaml: **suhvli**

* Yaml: **kerge**

LEXICON N_3PERAEDUE  perädü:perädü
* Yaml: **peraedue**

LEXICON N_3ALADU  aladu:aladu
* Yaml: **peraedue**

* Yaml: **tervues**

* Yaml: **A-ainus**

* Yaml: **N-oppaja5**

* Yaml: **N-mängjä5**

* Yaml: **fueuesiga**

kipõń:kipõn
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

allaś:allas
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

sinneĺ:sinnel
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

veteĺ:vetel
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

tukõv:tukõv
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

verrev:verrev
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

sallai:sallai
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

elläi:elläi
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

herre:herre
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

villõ:villõ
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

LEXICON N_10HWRAK  hõrak:hõrak

* Noun 10 hõrak  examples:*
* *hõrak:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Nom`
* *hõraga:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Gen`
* *hõrakat:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Par`
* *hõrakahe:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Ill`
* *hõrakan:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Ine`
* *hõrakast:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Ela`
* *hõrakalõ:* `hõrak+N+Sg+All`
* *hõrakal:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Ade`
* *hõrakalt:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Abl`
* *hõrakas:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Tra`
* *hõrakaniq:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Ter`
* *hõrakaldaq:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Abe`
* *hõragagaq:* `hõrak+N+Sg+Com`
* *hõragaq:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Nom`
* *hõrakidõ:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Gen`
* *hõrakit:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Par`
* *hõrakihe:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Ill`
* *hõrakin:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Ine`
* *hõrakist:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Ela`
* *hõrakilõ:* `hõrak+N+Pl+All`
* *hõrakil:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Ade`
* *hõrakilt:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Abl`
* *hõrakis:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Tra`
* *hõrakiniq:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Ter`
* *hõrakildaq:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Abe`
* *hõrakidõgaq:* `hõrak+N+Pl+Com`

LEXICON N_10HAIDAK  haidak:haidak

LEXICON N_10ESAEK  esäk:esäk

LEXICON N_10RAAMAT  raamat:raamat

LEXICON N_10LEMBIT  esäk:esäk

LEXICON N_10AABITS  aabits:aabits

LEXICON N_10HEERITS  heerits:heerits

LEXICON N_10AADRWS1  aadrõś:aadrõs

LEXICON N_10AMMAT1  ammat́:ammat

LEXICON N_10HUEPAETS1  hüpätś:hüpä%{td%}s

LEXICON N_11LAETEQ  läteq:lä%{tØ%}te

LEXICON N_11ANNWQ  annõq:andõ

LEXICON N_11AINWQ  ainõq:ainõ
LEXICON N_11KELMEQ  kelmeq:ainõ

LEXICON N_11VAIH  vaih:vaih

LEXICON N_12NWKWS1   nõkõś:nõ%{kg%}õ%{sś%}

LEXICON N_13ALONW  alonõ:alo

LEXICON N_13TAEHINE  tähine:tähi

Gradation: No

LEXICON N_14RITS1KAS  ritśkas:ritśka%{sØ%}

Gradation: No

LEXICON N_14HAMMAS  hammas:ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}, saabas:saapa
distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation

LEXICON N_14IKAES  ikäs:ikkä
distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation

LEXICON N_14NUMMWR1  nummõŕ:numbõr
distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation

vowel_harmony: front
gradation: yes

vowel_harmony: back
gradation: yes

kotus:kotus
* Yaml: **N-kotus15**

kotus:kotus
* Yaml: **N-ilves15**

LEXICON N_16INEMINE 
inemine:inemi
* Yaml: **N-inemine16**

LEXICON N_16ABILINW 
abilinõ:abili
* Yaml: **N-abilinw16**

LEXICON N_16TERAEKENE 
inemine:inemi
* Yaml: **N-inemine16**

LEXICON N_16TSIRGUKWNW 
tsirgukõnõ:abili
* Yaml: **N-abilinw16**

LEXICON N_19ALOMANW  alomanõ:aloma

LEXICON N_19PEDAEJAENE  pedäjäne:pedäjä

LEXICON N_20LATS1  latś:lat%{sś%}

LEXICON N_20TAEUES1  täüś:täü

LEXICON N_20VIIS1  täüś:täü

LEXICON N_20ORS1  täüś:täü

LEXICON N_20HIRS1  täüś:täü

LEXICON N_20VAEITS1  väitś:väits

LEXICON N_20KUEUEDS1  küüdś:küüds

LEXICON N_20MIIS1  miiś:m

LEXICON N_21HUEDSI  hüdsi:hü

LEXICON N_21KUSI  kusi:kus

LEXICON N_22VWROKWNW  võrokõnõ:võrokõ

LEXICON N_22NAANW  naanõ:naa

LEXICON N_22VAEHAEKENE  vähäkene:vähäke

* LEXICON N_23NUUL1  nuuĺ:n%{ou%}%{ou%}l

* LEXICON N_23SUUR1  suuŕ:suur

* LEXICON N_23KIIL1   kiiĺ:keel

* LEXICON N_23HIIR1   hiiŕ:hiir

* LEXICON N_24KAESI  käsi:kä

* LEXICON N_24SUSI  susi:su

gradation: yes

* **LEXICON N_27KUEMMEND ** kümmend:küm

* **LEXICON N_28TUETAER1 ** tütäŕ:tütär

* **LEXICON N_28PINNAER1 ** pinnäŕ:pin%{dn%}är

* **LEXICON N_28PAPWR1 ** papõŕ:papõr

* **LEXICON N_28KANNWL1 ** kannõĺ:kan%{dn%}õl

* **LEXICON N_28KINNER1 ** kinneŕ:kin%{dn%}er

* **LEXICON N_28SWSAR1 ** sõsaŕ:sõsar

* **LEXICON N_28PUNDAR ** pundar:pun%{td%}ar

* **LEXICON N_28KAEMMAEL ** kämmäl:käm%{bm%}äl

* LEXICON N_29KUU  kuu:kuu

* LEXICON N_29HAEAE  pää:pää

* Noun 33 examples:*

tarõ:tar

uma:uma

pesä:pesä

nimi:ni%{mØ%}m

lumi:lum

LEXICON N_36TUUM1  tuuḿ:t%{ou%}%{ou%}m

LEXICON N_36HANG1  hanǵ:hang

LEXICON N_36SAERG1  särǵ:sär%{gǵØ%}

LEXICON N_36LAHT1  laht́:lah%{tt́Ø%}

LEXICON N_36PAEIV  päiv:päiv

LEXICON N_36LEIB  päiv:päiv

* LEXICON N_36SILM  silm:silm
harmony: front

* LEXICON N_36RAMM  ramm:ramm
harmony: back

* LEXICON N_36TIIM  tiim:t%{ei%}%{ei%}m
harmony: front

* LEXICON N_36NJUKR  ńukr:ńu%{kg%}r
harmony: back

* LEXICON N_36LAEHK  lähk:läh%{kØ%}
harmony: front

kogõr:kogõr
* Yaml: **N-kogwr36**
derived from 36särǵ

kokr:ko%{kg%}r
* Yaml: **N-kogwr36**
derived from 36särǵ

sõbõr:sõbõr
oblique plural in o
* Yaml: **N-swbwr36**
derived from 36särǵ

kubõl:ku%{pb%}õl
oblique plural in õ
* Yaml: **N-swbwr36**
derived from 36särǵ

LEXICON N_37PINI  pini:pini

LEXICON N_37WLI  õli:õli

LEXICON N_37MUNA  muna:mu%{nØ%}na

* LEXICON N_38HUETT  hütt:hütt

* LEXICON N_39VIDO  vido:vi%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}o

* LEXICON N_39HAEBUE  häbü:hä%{pØ%}%{pbØ%}ü

LEXICON N_40TALO  talo:ta%{lØ%}lo

LEXICON N_40HELUE  helü:helü

LEXICON N_40UJA  uja:u%{jØ%}ja

LEXICON N_40IJAE  ijä:i%{jØ%}jä

LEXICON N_40SAVV  savv:savvu

LEXICON N_40TUEKK  tükk:tü%{kØ%}kü

LEXICON N_41JUHT1  juht́:juht
* Yaml: **juht́**

LEXICON N_41AIG  aig:a
* Yaml: **aig, aig**

LEXICON N_41ASK  aig:aig
* Yaml: **aig, aig**
ask:as%{kØ%}o
juusk:j%{ou%}%{ou%}s%{kØ%}u

LEXICON N_41MAENG  aig:aig
* Yaml: **aig, aig**
ask:as%{kØ%}o
juusk:j%{ou%}%{ou%}s%{kØ%}u

LEXICON N_41VIIT  aig:aig
* Yaml: **aig, aig**

LEXICON N_43KANARIK  usklik+A:%{ˋØ%}#uskli%{kØ%}%{kg%}

LEXICON N_43ELAENIK  elänik+N:eläni%{kØ%}%{kg%}

LEXICON N_43SASLWK1 

LEXICON N_43APRIL1 

LEXICON N_43SEKRETAER1 

LEXICON N_43AASTAK 

LEXICON N_44SWDA  sõda:sõ%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a

LEXICON N_45KANA  kana:ka%{nØ%}na

LEXICON N_45RIHAE  rihä:ri%{hØ%}hä

LEXICON N_46HAIN  hain:hain
* Yaml: **N-jalg, N-hain**

LEXICON N_46TARK  tark:tark
* Yaml: **N-jalg, N-tark**

LEXICON N_47ASI  asi:asi

LEXICON N_47VELI  veli:ve%{lØ%}l

LEXICON N_47KIRI  kiri:kiri

### NOMINAL DECLENSIONS

LEXICON NMN_1HANS1A  1 hanśa:hanśa

* Noun 01 hanśa examples:*
* *hanśa* `hanśa+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *hanśat* `hanśa+N+Sg+Par:`
* *hanśahtõ* `hanśa+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *hanśast* `hanśa+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *hanśalõ* `hanśa+N+Sg+All:`
* *hanśal* `hanśa+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *hanśalt* `hanśa+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *hanśas* `hanśa+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *hanśaniq* `hanśa+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *hanśaldaq* `hanśa+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *hanśagaq* `hanśa+N+Sg+Com:`
* *hanśaq* `hanśa+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *hanśasit* `hanśa+N+Pl+Par:`
* *hanśadõhe* `hanśa+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *hanśadõst* `hanśa+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *hanśadõlõ* `hanśa+N+Pl+All:`
* *hanśadõl* `hanśa+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *hanśadõlt* `hanśa+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *hanśadõs* `hanśa+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *hanśadõniq* `hanśa+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *hanśadõldaq* `hanśa+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *hanśadõgaq* `hanśa+N+Pl+Com:`

in d

LEXICON NMN_1HERRAE  1 herrä:herrä

* Noun 01 herrä examples:*
* *herrä* `herrä+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *herrät* `herrä+N+Sg+Par:`
* *herrähte* `herrä+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *herräst* `herrä+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *herräle* `herrä+N+Sg+All:`
* *herräl* `herrä+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *herrält* `herrä+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *herräs* `herrä+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *herräniq* `herrä+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *herräldäq* `herrä+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *herrägaq* `herrä+N+Sg+Com:`
* *herräq* `herrä+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *herräsit* `herrä+N+Pl+Par:`
* *herrädehe* `herrä+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *herrädest* `herrä+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *herrädele* `herrä+N+Pl+All:`
* *herrädel* `herrä+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *herrädelt* `herrä+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *herrädes* `herrä+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *herrädeniq* `herrä+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *herrädeldäq* `herrä+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *herrädegaq* `herrä+N+Pl+Com:`

in d

* Yaml: **suhvli**

* Yaml: **kerge**

LEXICON NMN_3PERAEDUE  perädü:perädü
* Yaml: **A-peraedue3** same as aladu

LEXICON NMN_3ALADU  aladu:aladu

* Noun 03 aladu examples:*
* *aladu* `aladu+A+Sg+Nom:`
* *alatut* `aladu+A+Sg+Par:`
* *alatuhe* `aladu+A+Sg+Ill:`
* *alatuid* `aladu+A+Pl+Par:`
* *alatuihe* `aladu+A+Pl+Ill:`
* *alatuilõ* `aladu+A+Pl+All:`
* *alatumb* `aladu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:`

* Yaml: **A-aladu3**

* Noun 04 tervüs examples:*
* *tervüs* `tervüs+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *tervüst* `tervüs+N+Sg+Par:`
* *tervüste* `tervüs+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *tervüsest* `tervüs+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *tervüsele* `tervüs+N+Sg+All:`
* *tervüsel* `tervüs+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *tervüselt* `tervüs+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *tervüses* `tervüs+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *tervüseniq* `tervüs+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *tervüseldäq* `tervüs+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *tervüsegaq* `tervüs+N+Sg+Com:`
* *tervüseq* `tervüs+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *tervüisi* `tervüs+N+Pl+Par:`
* *tervüisihe* `tervüs+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *tervüisist* `tervüs+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *tervüisile* `tervüs+N+Pl+All:`
* *tervüisil* `tervüs+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *tervüisilt* `tervüs+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *tervüisis* `tervüs+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *tervüisiniq* `tervüs+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *tervüisildäq* `tervüs+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *tervüisigaq* `tervüs+N+Pl+Com:`

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth:%^VowRM%^CnsRM%>i Harm_Neutr_PL-GEN_dE ;  tervide
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth:%^VowRM%^CnsRM%>i PL-ILL_he ;  tervihe

* **LEXICON NMN_4AINUS ** Types 4, 8, 17

* Noun 04 examples:*
* *ainus* `ainus+A+Sg+Nom:`
* *ainut* `ainus+A+Sg+Par:`
* *ainuhe* `ainus+A+Sg+Ill:`
* *ainust* `ainus+A+Sg+Ela:`
* *ainulõ* `ainus+A+Sg+All:`
* *ainul* `ainus+A+Sg+Ade:`
* *ainult* `ainus+A+Sg+Abl:`
* *ainus* `ainus+A+Sg+Tra:`
* *ainuniq* `ainus+A+Sg+Ter:`
* *ainuldaq* `ainus+A+Sg+Abe:`
* *ainugaq* `ainus+A+Sg+Com:`
* *ainuq* `ainus+A+Pl+Nom:`
* *ainuid* `ainus+A+Pl+Par:`
* *ainuihe* `ainus+A+Pl+Ill:`
* *ainuist* `ainus+A+Pl+Ela:`
* *ainuilõ* `ainus+A+Pl+All:`
* *ainuil* `ainus+A+Pl+Ade:`
* *ainuilt* `ainus+A+Pl+Abl:`
* *ainuis* `ainus+A+Pl+Tra:`
* *ainuiniq* `ainus+A+Pl+Ter:`
* *ainuildaq* `ainus+A+Pl+Abe:`
* *ainuidõgaq* `ainus+A+Pl+Com:`
* *ainumb* `ainus+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:`

ainus:ainus
* Yaml: **A-ainus4**

* LEXICON NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE  oppaja:oppaja

* Adjective 05 kerge examples:*
* *kerge* `kerge+A+Sg+Nom:`
* *kerget* `kerge+A+Sg+Par:`
* *kergehe* `kerge+A+Sg+Ill:`
* *kergest* `kerge+A+Sg+Ela:`
* *kergele* `kerge+A+Sg+All:`
* *kergel* `kerge+A+Sg+Ade:`
* *kergelt* `kerge+A+Sg+Abl:`
* *kerges* `kerge+A+Sg+Tra:`
* *kergeniq* `kerge+A+Sg+Ter:`
* *kergeldäq* `kerge+A+Sg+Abe:`
* *kergegaq* `kerge+A+Sg+Com:`
* *kergeq* `kerge+A+Pl+Nom:`
* *kergit* `kerge+A+Pl+Par:`
* *kergihe* `kerge+A+Pl+Ill:`
* *kergist* `kerge+A+Pl+Ela:`
* *kergile* `kerge+A+Pl+All:`
* *kergil* `kerge+A+Pl+Ade:`
* *kergilt* `kerge+A+Pl+Abl:`
* *kergis* `kerge+A+Pl+Tra:`
* *kerginiq* `kerge+A+Pl+Ter:`
* *kergildäq* `kerge+A+Pl+Abe:`
* *kergidegaq* `kerge+A+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-oppaja5, kerge5**

* LEXICON NMN_6MAKW/HELLE  makõ:ma%{kØ%}kõ

* Adjective (6) tikõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm: Noun - tikõ examples:*
* *tikõ:* `tikõ+A+Sg+Nom`
* *tikõ:* `tikõ+A+Sg+Gen`
* *tikõt:* `tikõ+A+Sg+Par`
* *tikkõhe:* `tikõ+A+Sg+Ill`
* *tikkidõ:* `tikõ+A+Pl+Gen`
* *tikkit:* `tikõ+A+Pl+Par`
* *tikkihe:* `tikõ+A+Pl+Ill`
* *tikkilõ:* `tikõ+A+Pl+All`

* Noun 07 füüsiga examples:*
* *füüsiga* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *füüsikat* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Par:`
* *füüsikahe* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *füüsikast* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *füüsikalõ* `füüsiga+N+Sg+All:`
* *füüsikal* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *füüsikalt* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *füüsikas* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *füüsikaniq* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *füüsikaldaq* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *füüsigagaq* `füüsiga+N+Sg+Com:`
* *füüsigaq* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *füüsikit* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Par:`
* *füüsikihe* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *füüsikist* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *füüsikilõ* `füüsiga+N+Pl+All:`
* *füüsikil* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *füüsikilt* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *füüsikis* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *füüsikiniq* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *füüsikildaq* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *füüsikidõgaq* `füüsiga+N+Pl+Com:`
